v11.dix
<pardef n="b/IlYu_v">
        <e><p>
                <l>ixxanu</l>
                <r>IlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="masc"/><s n="past"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ixxalYu</l>
                <r>IlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="fem"/><s n="past"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ixxiwu</l>
                <r>IlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="neut"/><s n="past"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ixxavu</l>
                <r>IlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="neut"/><s n="past"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ixxaru</l>
                <r>IlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="past"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ixxeV</l>
                <r>IlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="past"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ixxiri</l>
                <r>IlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="past"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ixxeVnu</l>
                <r>IlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="past"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ixxeVvu</l>
                <r>IlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="past"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		
		<e><p>
                <l>IlYuwwixxAneV</l>
				<r>IlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="masc"/><s n="present"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>IlYuwwixxAlYeV</l>
				<r>IlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="fem"/><s n="present"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>IlYuwwixeV</l>
				<r>IlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="neut"/><s n="present"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>IlYuwwiveV</l>
				<r>IlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="neut"/><s n="present"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>IlYuwwixxAreV</l>
				<r>IlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="present"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>IlYuwwixxIya</l>
                <r>IlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="present"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>IlYuwwixxIri</l>
                <r>IlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="present"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>IlYuwwixxeneV</l>
                <r>IlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="present"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>IlYuwwiruveVnu</l>
                <r>IlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="present"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>IlYuwwixxeveV</l>
                <r>IlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="present"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>IlYuwwiruveVvu</l>
                <r>IlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="present"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>IlYuxxAneV</l>
				<r>IlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="masc"/><s n="future"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>IlYuxxAlYeV</l>
				<r>IlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="fem"/><s n="future"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>IlYuwwaxeV</l>
				<r>IlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="neut"/><s n="future"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>IlYuwwaveV</l>
				<r>IlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="neut"/><s n="future"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>IlYuwwAreV</l>
				<r>IlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="future"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>IlYuwwIya</l>
                <r>IlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="future"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>IlYuwwIri</l>
                <r>IlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="future"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>IlYuviri</l>
                <r>IlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="future"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>IlYuwweneV</l>
                <r>IlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="future"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
				<l>IlYuveVnu</l>
                <r>IlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="future"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>IlYuwweveV</l>
                <r>IlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="future"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>IlYuveVvu</l>
                <r>IlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="future"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		
</pardef>

<e lm="bIlYu"><i>b</i><par n="b/IlYu_v"/></e>
<e lm="jowubIlYu"><i>jowub</i><par n="b/IlYu_v"/></e>
<e lm="meleVbIlYu"><i>meleVb</i><par n="b/IlYu_v"/></e>
